en: Grating surface coarseness: Coarse; Extra fine; Fine; Julienne; Medium; Multi-size; Ribbon; Slice; Other
it: Granularità della superficie della grattugia: Grosso; Extra fine; Fine; Julienne; Medio; Multi-taglia; Nastro; Fetta; Altro
ru: Размер отверстий поверхности терки: Крупная; Очень мелкая; Мелкая; Для нарезки соломкой; Средняя; Разноразмерный; Для нарезки лентами; Ломтик; Другая
cs: Hrubost strouhací plochy: Hrubé; Extra jemné; Jemné; Jemné nudličky (julienne); Střední hrubost; Více velikostí; Proužky; Krájení; Jiné
ko: 강판 표면 입자 굵기: 거친; 매우 고운; 파인; 줄리엔; 중간; 멀티 사이즈; 리본; 슬라이스; 기타
vi: Độ nhám bề mặt bào: Tóc thô; Cực mịn; Mảnh; Cắt sợi Julienne; Vừa; Nhiều kích cỡ; Ruy-băng; Thái lát; Khác
de: Rauheit der Reibefläche: Grob; Extra fein; Fein; Julienne; Medium; Verschiedene Größen; Schleife; Scheiben; Sonstiges
fr: Dimension des trous sur la surface de râpage: Épais; Extra fin; Fin; Julienne; Moyen; Multi-taille; À ruban; Tranche; Autre
sv: Gallerytans grovhet: Tjockt; Extra fin; Fint; Julienne; Medium; Flervåningslek; Band; Skiva; Övrigt
pt-PT: Granulação da superfície de ralar: Grossa; Extrafina; Fina; Juliana; Médio; Multi-tamanho; Fita; Fatia; Outro
zh-CN: 刨丝器表面粗糙度: 粗丝; 特细; 细丝; 细条; 中等; 多尺寸; 带状; 切片; 其他
es: Grosor de la superficie de rallado: Grueso; Extrafino; Fino; Corte en juliana; Medio; Varios tamaños; Cinta; Rebanada; Otros
th: ความหยาบของพื้นผิวสำหรับขูด: หยาบ; ละเอียดพิเศษ; บาง; ซอยเป็นเส้นเล็ก; ปานกลาง; หลายระดับความหยาบ; ริบบิ้น; แบบสไลซ์; อื่นๆ
nl: Ruwheid van rasp: Grof; Extra fijn; Fijn; Julienne; Medium; Multi-maat; Lint; Plak; Overig
sk-SK: Hrubosť mriežkovaného povrchu: Hrubý; Extra jemný; Jemný; Julienne; Stredný; Viacero veľkostí; Páskový; Plátok; Iné
pt-BR: Rugosidade da superfície da grelha: Espesso; Extra fino; Ralo; Julienne; Médio; Tamanho múltiplo; Fita; Fatiado; Outro
zh-TW: 刨絲面粗糙度: 粗; 特細; 細; 切絲; 中; 多尺寸; 切條; 片; 其他
el: Βαθμός τραχύτητας επιφάνειας τριψίματος: Τραχιές; Εξαιρετικά ψιλή; Ψιλή; Ζουλιέν; Μεσαία; Πολυμέγεθος; Κορδέλα; Φέτα; Άλλο
tr: Rende yüzeyinin pürüzlülüğü: Kaba; Ekstra ince; İnce; Jülyen; Orta; Çok boyutlu; Şerit; Dilimleme; Diğer
hu: Rácsfelület érdessége: Durva; Extra finom; Finom; Julienne; Közepes; Több méretű; Szalag; Szelet; Egyéb
pl: Chropowatość powierzchni kratki: Grube; Bardzo drobne; Drobne; Julienne; Średnie; Wielorozmiarowa; Wstążkowe; Krojenie; Pozostałe
bg-BG: Степен на едрина на настъргване: Грубо; Изключително фино; Фино; Жулиен; Средно; С множество размери; Лентово; Резени; Друго
ro-RO: Asperitatea suprafeței de ras: Grosieră; Foarte fină; Fină; Julienne; Medie; Multidimensional; Fâșii; Feliere; Altele
nb: Grovhet på riveoverflaten: Grovt; Ekstra fint; Tynn; Julienne; Middels; Multistørrelse; Bånd; Skive; Annet
hr-HR: Grubost površine ribeža: Krupni; Ekstra sitni; Tanka; Julienne; Srednje; Više veličina; Vrpca; Za rezanje na ploške; Ostalo
lt-LT: Tarkavimo paviršiaus stambumas: Šiurkštus; Itin smulkus; Plonas; Julienne; Vidutinis; Kelių dydžių; Juostinis; Pjaustymas; Kita
sl-SI: Grobost površine za ribanje: Grobo; Zelo fin; Fino; Julienne; Srednja; Več velikosti; Tračni; Rezina; Druga
fi: Raastopinnan karkeusaste: Karkea; Erittäin hieno; Ohut; Julienne; Keskitasoinen; Monikokoinen; Nauha; Viipale; Muu
ja: おろし器表面の粗さ: 粗い; 極細; 微細; 細片; 中程度; マルチサイズ; リボン; スライス; その他
da: Rivejerns overfladegrovhed: Groft; Ekstra fint; Fin; Julienne; Medium; Flere størrelser; Bånd; Skive; Andet